South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S956.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-90(2) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (m) amounts paid for contracts for services entered into by the State or political subdivisions thereof, for Emergency Services IP Network, also known as ESInet, in support of Next Generation 911 in South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect July 1, 2026. ----XX----